Utah statutes.
26-6b-1.    Applicability of chapter -- Administrative procedures.

(1)  This chapter applies to involuntary examination, treatment, isolation, and quarantine actions applied to individuals or groups of individuals by the department or a local health department.

(2)  The provisions of this chapter supersede the provisions of Title 63G, Chapter 4, Administrative Procedures Act.

(3)  The Department of Health may adopt rules in accordance with Title 63G, Chapter 3, Utah Administrative Rulemaking Act, as necessary to administer the provisions of this chapter.

